Illinois, session 104th, HB1138.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act is 5amended by adding Section 17.2 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3305/17.2 new)7    Sec. 17.2. Minimal county allocation; Emergency Management 8Performance Grant Program. Notwithstanding any other provision 9of law, the Agency must adopt amendments to its rules 10governing the administration of the Emergency Management 11Performance Grant program to ensure that every county 12emergency services and disaster agency in the State receives a 13base allotment of no less than $25,000 per fiscal year, with 14the remaining allocation of funds to be distributed to county 15emergency services and disaster agencies as deemed appropriate 16by the Director. In distributing the remaining allocation of 17funds, the Director shall consider, among other things, any 18limitation on a county's tax base, the increased costs of 19accreditation requirements for smaller agencies, and the 20increase in the number of disasters that affect smaller 21counties in the State. 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   HB1138- 2 -LRB104 03700 BDA 13724 b1becoming law.